Hawaii statutes.
[§421I-10] Applicability of other laws.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to relieve any corporation from
compliance with or being subject to any other applicable law. [L 1993, c 282,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next